Massachusetts, session 194th, H256.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 93 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph after the fifth paragraph:-
Any State owned and maintained public building or place of public accommodation containing a
public toilet room that is newly constructed, reconstructed or remodeled on or after January 1,
2025 shall install and maintain at least one universal changing station. The bathroom shall be
conspicuously marked as containing a public universal size changing table. The changing table
shall be capable of supporting a minimum of 350 pounds and providing a changing surface of
70 inches minimum in length and 30 inches minimum in width. The changing surface height
shall be adjustable at variable heights from 17 inches minimum to 38 inches maximum above the
floor as measured to the top of the changing surface.
SECTION 2. Section 93 of said chapter 143 is hereby further amended by inserting the
following definitions after the sixth paragraph:-
of 4

“Universal changing station,” an adult sized changing table designed to hold at least
350lbs that is located within an enclosed restroom facility that is for use by persons of any
age who require assistance with diapering and is accessible by persons of any sex.
"State owned and maintained”, is a building with a public bathroom belonging to, funded
by, and controlled by the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, its political subdivisions, and its
public authorities and other public instrumentalities.
SECTION 3. Section 93 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following after the definitions: The board shall
adopt regulations regarding the requirement that any State-owned and maintained public building
that is newly constructed, reconstructed or remodeled on or after January 1, 2025 to install and
maintain at least one universal changing station.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Board shall be aligned with the specifications
determined in the 2024 International Building Code section 1110.4, Adult Changing Stations and
the International Code Council A117.1 Supplement 1: Standard for Accessible and Usable
Buildings and Facilities; Section 613: Adult Changing Stations. These include but are not limited
to:
(1) a requirement that the entrance to each universal changing station has conspicuous
signage indicating the location of the station;
(2) a requirement that if a public building has a central directory, said central directory
must indicate the location of the universal changing station;
of 4

(3) a requirement for signage indicating the weight capacity and instructions for operation
of the changing station within the room;
(4) a requirement that all universal changing stations shall:
(A) be equipped with a height-adjustable changing table capable of supporting a
minimum of 350 pounds and providing a changing surface of 70 inches minimum in length and
30 inches minimum in width. The changing surface height shall be adjustable at variable heights
from 17 inches minimum to 38 inches maximum above the floor as measured to the top of the
changing surface;
(B) provide safety features of sidebar rails and safety belts;
(C) be located inside a private restroom or in a private stall, enclosed area or privacy
screen within a multi-stall restroom;
(D) provide adequate space for assistance, following the IBC guidelines for end and side
clearance; and
(E) comply with all requirements of the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(5) any other issues regarding implementation that the board deems appropriate.
(c) If the Board determines that the inclusion of a wall mounted, adjustable height
Universal Changing Table is not feasible or would destroy historic significance of a historic
property, the Board may allow instead for the placement of a freestanding, mobile, height-
adjustable Universal Changing Table.
of 4

(d) The Board may grant an exemption from the requirements of this section if it
determines:
(1) the installation would create a condition that does not comply with the Americans
with Disabilities Act standards for access for persons with disabilities.
(2) the cost of the proposed reconstruction or remodeling without the inclusion of a
changing table does not exceed $10,000.
of 4